Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.120

Appeal—Further review.

Except as provided in RCW 43.24.112, any person feeling aggrieved by the refusal of the director to issue a license, or to renew one, or by the revocation or suspension of a license shall have a right of appeal to superior court from the decision of the director of licensing, which shall be taken, prosecuted, heard, and determined in the manner provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

The decision of the superior court may be reviewed by the supreme court or the court of appeals in the same manner as other civil cases.

[ 1997 c 58 s 868; 1987 c 202 s 212; 1979 c 158 s 102; 1971 c 81 s 112; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.120. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 106; RRS s 10864.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Writ procedure superseded by RAP 2.1, 2.2, 18.22.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.